California, session 20252026, AB2602.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18030.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:18030.5. A manufactured home, mobilehome, recreational vehicle, commercial coach, or special purpose commercial coach which that meets the standards prescribed by this chapter, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto, shall not be required to comply with any local ordinances or regulations prescribing requirements in conflict with the standards prescribed in this chapter.